New Jersey, session 221, A1487.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Board means the Board of Public Utilities. "Eligible low-speed electric bicycle" means a 1new1 two or three-wheeled vehicle with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of less than 750 watts, 1that meets the safety standard ANSI/CAN/UL 2849 for ebikes,1 with a purchase price of not less than $1,000, that meets the requirements of one of the following classifications:  "class 1 low-speed electric bicycle," which means a low-speed electric bicycle equipped with a motor that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling, and that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of 20 miles per hour; or "class 2 low-speed electric bicycle,'' which means a low-speed electric bicycle equipped with a motor that may be used exclusively to propel the bicycle, and that is not capable of providing assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of 20 miles per hour. b.    No later than one year after the effective date of this section, the Board of Public Utilities shall establish and implement a program to provide rebates to 1[certain]1 residents of the State for the purchase of eligible low-speed electric bicycles.  The purpose of the rebate program shall be to reduce emissions from motor vehicles by encouraging the purchase and use of low-speed electric bicycles 1[in urban areas]1 for short distance trips.  The board shall advertise the availability of rebates pursuant to this section in the same manner that it advertises the availability of incentives for plug-in electric vehicles pursuant to P.L.2019, c.362 (C.48:25-1 et seq.). c.     (1)  The rebate shall be in an amount of up to $2,000 but in no case shall the rebate exceed 150 percent of1 the 1retail1 purchase price of the eligible low-speed electric bicycle. (2)   A rebate shall be made available only to a resident of 1[a municipality with a population over 70,000] the State who makes an in-person purchase1. (3)   A rebate shall be provided to a person who 1[purchases an eligible low-speed electric bicycle in two installments.  The first installment shall be for 50 percent of the rebate amount to be paid] establishes proof of an in-person purchase to the board and1 upon approval by the board of an application that meets the requirements established in this section 1[, and the second installment shall be for 50 percent of the rebate amount at least one year after the first installment payment of the rebate upon receipt by the board of proof of use and continued ownership of the eligible low-speed electric bicycle for at least one year]1. d.    The board shall determine the types or brands of eligible low-speed electric bicycles eligible for the rebate pursuant to this section and the manner and form for residents to apply for, and if eligible, receive a rebate pursuant to this section.  The board may establish other requirements and parameters for the rebate program as it deems necessary and reasonable to further the goals of the program. e.     1The board shall provide $1 million from the societal benefits charge imposed pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-60) to make disbursements for the low-speed electric bicycle rebate program established pursuant to this section. f.1   The board may adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), such rules and regulations as may be necessary for the implementation of the rebate program established pursuant to this section. 1[2.  There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Public Utilities the sum of $250,000 for the purposes of providing rebates pursuant to the program established in section 1 of this act.]1 1[3.] 2.1  This act shall take effect immediately.